src/fst/affixes/quantifiers.lexc
!! # Quantifier inflection
! ---------------
!! Nenets quantifiers ...

LEXICON NUM_МЯДО !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_МЯДО ;

LEXICON NUM_ВАР !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ВАР ;

LEXICON NUM_ҢУДИ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ҢУДИ ;

LEXICON NUM_ҢОДИ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ҢОДИ ;

LEXICON NUM_ТАРЕ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ТАРЕ ;

LEXICON NUM_ЕД !!= @CODE@ ед: 13 
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ЕД ;

LEXICON NUM_ЕД/ТИРЕ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ЕД/ТИРЕ ;

LEXICON NUM_ЕД/ХАНО !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ЕД/ХАНО ;

LEXICON NUM_ҢОДИ/ТЁН !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: N_ҢОДИ/ТЁН ;

LEXICON NUM_ТИРЕ/ХАНО !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ТИРЕ/ХАНО ;

LEXICON NUM_ХУСУВЭЙ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Qnt+Num+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Num+Der/MWN: NMN_ХУСУВЭЙ ;

LEXICON QNT_ХУСУВЭЙ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Qnt+Adn: K ;
+Qnt+Der/MWN+N: NMN_ХУСУВЭЙ ;

!! we need to get away from these: NUM_VOW and NUM_CONS
!! it's done
!!LEXICON NUM_VOW 
!!+Qnt+Adn: K ;
!!+Qnt+Der/MWN: N_Vow ;
!!
!!LEXICON NUM_CONS
!!+Qnt+Adn: K ;
!!+Qnt+Der/MWN: N_Cons ;
!!
!!LEXICON NUM_D
!!+Qnt+Adn: K ;
!!+Qnt+Der/MWN: NMN_МЯДО ;
!!
!!LEXICON NUM_N
!!+Qnt+Adn: K ;
!!+Qnt+Der/MWN: N_ТЭНО ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
